Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB952.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1523 of Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1523. Notices before service to landlord terminated.* * *(d) Rights of landlords .--Before any termination of service to a landlord who has notified a public utility in writing of the landlord's ownership interest in a property served by the public utility, the public utility shall provide written notice to the landlord of the proposed termination via first class mail or by email, text message or other electronic messaging format in accordance with the commission's privacy guidelines at least seven days before the date of termination of service. In the 1234567891011121314151617 case of electronic notification only, the landlord shall affirmatively consent to be contacted using a specific electronic messaging format for the purpose of termination of service. If the originating cause of the proposed termination of service is not resolved, the public utility shall provide a final written notice under this subsection via first class mail to the landlord on the day of the proposed termination date. This subsection shall not apply to a landlord ratepayer.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0952PN1019 - 2 - 123456789